src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX vA Y 47
SFX vA ettre ettre/n'q'd'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettant/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre is/q' mettre
SFX vA ettre ise/q' mettre
SFX vA ettre ises/q' mettre
SFX vA ettre ets/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ets/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre et/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettons/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettais/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettais/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettait/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettions/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettiez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettaient/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre is/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre is/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre it/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre îmes/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre îtes/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre irent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrai/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettras/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettra/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrons/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettront/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrais/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrais/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrait/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrions/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettriez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettraient/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ette/n'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettes/n'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ette/n'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettions/n'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettiez/n'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettent/n'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre isse/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre isses/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ît/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre issions/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre issiez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre issent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre

SFX vC Y 47
SFX vC mettre mettre/m't's' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettant/m't's' mettre
SFX vC mettre mis mettre
SFX vC mettre mise mettre
SFX vC mettre mises mettre
SFX vC mettre mets/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre mets/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre met/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettons mettre
SFX vC mettre mettez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettent/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettais/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettais/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettait/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettions mettre
SFX vC mettre mettiez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettaient/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mis/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre mis/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mit/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mîmes mettre
SFX vC mettre mîtes mettre
SFX vC mettre mirent/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrai/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettras/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettra/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrons mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettront/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrais/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrais/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrait/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrions mettre
SFX vC mettre mettriez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettraient/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mette/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettes/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mette/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettions mettre
SFX vC mettre mettiez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettent/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre misse/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre misses/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mît/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre missions mettre
SFX vC mettre missiez mettre
SFX vC mettre missent/s' mettre

SFX wA N 48
SFX wA eindre eindre eindre
SFX wA eindre eignant eindre
SFX wA eindre eint eindre
SFX wA eindre eints eindre
SFX wA eindre einte eindre
SFX wA eindre eintes eindre
SFX wA eindre eins eindre
SFX wA eindre eins eindre
SFX wA eindre eint eindre
SFX wA eindre eignons eindre
SFX wA eindre eignez eindre
SFX wA eindre eignent eindre
SFX wA eindre eignais eindre
SFX wA eindre eignais eindre
SFX wA eindre eignait eindre
SFX wA eindre eignions eindre
SFX wA eindre eigniez eindre
SFX wA eindre eignaient eindre
SFX wA eindre eignis eindre
SFX wA eindre eignis eindre
SFX wA eindre eignit eindre
SFX wA eindre eignîmes eindre
SFX wA eindre eignîtes eindre
SFX wA eindre eignirent eindre
SFX wA eindre eindrai eindre
SFX wA eindre eindras eindre
SFX wA eindre eindra eindre
SFX wA eindre eindrons eindre
SFX wA eindre eindrez eindre
SFX wA eindre eindront eindre
SFX wA eindre eindrais eindre
SFX wA eindre eindrais eindre
SFX wA eindre eindrait eindre
SFX wA eindre eindrions eindre
SFX wA eindre eindriez eindre
SFX wA eindre eindraient eindre
SFX wA eindre eigne eindre
SFX wA eindre eignes eindre
SFX wA eindre eigne eindre
SFX wA eindre eignions eindre
SFX wA eindre eigniez eindre
SFX wA eindre eignent eindre
SFX wA eindre eignisse eindre
SFX wA eindre eignisses eindre
SFX wA eindre eignît eindre
SFX wA eindre eignissions eindre
SFX wA eindre eignissiez eindre
SFX wA eindre eignissent eindre

SFX wB Y 48
SFX wB indre indre/n'q'd'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignant/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre int/q' indre
SFX wB indre ints/q' indre
SFX wB indre inte/q' indre
SFX wB indre intes/q' indre
SFX wB indre ins/n'q'j'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ins/n'q'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre int/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignons/n'q'l't' indre
SFX wB indre ignez/n'q'l'm' indre
SFX wB indre ignent/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignais/n'q'j'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ignais/n'q'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ignait/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignions/n'q'l't' indre
SFX wB indre igniez/n'q'l'm' indre
SFX wB indre ignaient/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignis/n'q'j'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ignis/n'q'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ignit/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignîmes/n'q'l't' indre
SFX wB indre ignîtes/n'q'l'm' indre
SFX wB indre ignirent/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre indrai/n'q'j'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre indras/n'q'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre indra/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre indrons/n'q'l't' indre
SFX wB indre indrez/n'q'l'm' indre
SFX wB indre indront/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre indrais/n'q'j'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre indrais/n'q'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre indrait/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre indrions/n'q'l't' indre
SFX wB indre indriez/n'q'l'm' indre
SFX wB indre indraient/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre igne/n'j'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ignes/n'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre igne/n'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignions/n'l't' indre
SFX wB indre igniez/n'l'm' indre
SFX wB indre ignent/n'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignisse/n'q'j'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ignisses/n'q'l'm't' indre
SFX wB indre ignît/n'q'l'm't's' indre
SFX wB indre ignissions/n'q'l't' indre
SFX wB indre ignissiez/n'q'l'm' indre
SFX wB indre ignissent/n'q'l'm't's' indre

SFX wD N 48
SFX wD aire aire faire
SFX wD aire aisant faire
SFX wD aire ait faire
SFX wD aire aits faire
SFX wD aire aite faire
SFX wD aire aites faire
SFX wD aire ais faire
SFX wD aire ais faire
SFX wD aire ait faire
SFX wD aire aisons faire
SFX wD aire aites faire
SFX wD aire ont faire
SFX wD aire aisais faire
SFX wD aire aisais faire
SFX wD aire aisait faire
SFX wD aire aisions faire
SFX wD aire aisiez faire
SFX wD aire aisaient faire
SFX wD aire is faire
SFX wD aire is faire
SFX wD aire it faire
SFX wD aire îmes faire
SFX wD aire îtes faire
SFX wD aire irent faire
SFX wD aire erai faire
SFX wD aire eras faire
SFX wD aire era faire
SFX wD aire erons faire
SFX wD aire erez faire
SFX wD aire eront faire
SFX wD aire erais faire
SFX wD aire erais faire
SFX wD aire erait faire
SFX wD aire erions faire
SFX wD aire eriez faire
SFX wD aire eraient faire
SFX wD aire asse faire
SFX wD aire asses faire
SFX wD aire asse faire
SFX wD aire assions faire
SFX wD aire assiez faire
SFX wD aire assent faire
SFX wD aire isse faire
SFX wD aire isses faire
SFX wD aire ît faire
SFX wD aire issions faire
SFX wD aire issiez faire
SFX wD aire issent faire

SFX wF N 12
SFX wF faire faire faire
SFX wF faire faisant faire
SFX wF faire fait faire
SFX wF faire faits faire
SFX wF faire faite faire
SFX wF faire faites faire
SFX wF faire fais faire
SFX wF faire fais faire
SFX wF faire fait faire
SFX wF faire faisons faire
SFX wF faire faites faire
SFX wF faire font faire

SFX wG N 6
SFX wG aire aire faire
SFX wG aire aisant faire
SFX wG aire ait faire
SFX wG aire aits faire
SFX wG aire aite faire
SFX wG aire aites faire
