src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.dic
adjoindre/wB()
admettre/vA()
astreindre/wB()
atteindre/wB()
ceindre/wB()
commettre/vA()
compromettre/vA()
conjoindre/wB()
contrefaire/wD()
disjoindre/wB()
défaire/wD()
démettre/vA()
dépeindre/wB()
déteindre/wB()
empreindre/wB()
enceindre/wB()
enfreindre/wB()
enjoindre/wB()
entremettre/vC()
faire/wD()
feindre/wB()
forfaire/wF()
geindre/wA()
joindre/wB()
mettre/vA()
oindre/wB()
omettre/vA()
parfaire/wD()
peindre/wB()
permettre/vA()
poindre/wB()
promettre/vA()
redéfaire/wD()
refaire/wD()
rejoindre/wB()
remettre/vA()
repeindre/wB()
restreindre/wB()
reteindre/wB()
retransmettre/vA()
réadmettre/vA()
réémettre/vA()
satisfaire/wD()
soumettre/vA()
stupéfaire/wG()
surfaire/wD()
teindre/wB()
transmettre/vA()
émettre/vA()
éteindre/wB()
étreindre/wB()
